Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3953.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.1285, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Issuance of plates. The commissioner must issue Minnesota agriculture special plates or a single motorcycle plate to an applicant who: (1) is a registered owner of a passenger automobile, deleted text begin noncommercialdeleted text end one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, new text begin farm truck, new text end or recreational vehicle; (2) pays a fee in the amount specified under section 168.12, subdivision 5, for each set of plates, along with any other fees required by this chapter; (3) pays the registration tax as required under section 168.013new text begin or 168.018new text end ; (4) contributes a minimum of $20 annually to the Minnesota agriculture account; and (5) complies with this chapter and rules governing registration of motor vehicles and licensing of drivers.